Utah statutes.
58-40-103.   Rulemaking.

When exercising rulemaking authority under this chapter, the division shall comply with the requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.



Enacted by Chapter 82, 2012 General Session

